Massachusetts, session 194th, S2692.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1: The board of elementary and secondary education shall establish a school
meal nutrition standards advisory council to advise the commissioner of elementary and
secondary education on implementation of the recommendations of the school meal nutrition
standards commission established in section 77 of chapter 28 of the acts of 2023. The council
shall 1) provide ongoing guidance in the development of comprehensive strengthened nutrition
standards aligned with the most current public health guidance and evidence-based nutrition
standards, 2) provide ongoing feasibility assessments, 3) work with school food authorities and
stakeholders to reduce barriers to feasibility of implementation on issues including but not
limited to procurement, facilities and workforce training. The members of the council shall serve
without compensation but may be reimbursed, subject to appropriation, for expenses necessarily
and reasonably incurred in the performance of the member’s responsibilities. The council shall
consist of 11 members including 6 members to be appointed by the governor, who shall be
school nutrition operators or registered dieticians representing geographically, racially and socio-
economically diverse school districts across the commonwealth; a representative from Project
of 2

Bread – The Walk for Hunger, Inc.; a representative from the School Nutrition Association of
Massachusetts, Inc.; a representative from the Massachusetts Healthy School Lunch Coalition; a
representative from Massachusetts Farm to School; and a representative from the Massachusetts
Food System Collaborative. Members shall for a term of 3 years. Members serving on the
council shall represent a reasonable statewide geographic balance. The council shall meet not
less than four times each year. The council shall elect a chair to serve for a term of three years
who may appoint other officers as necessary.
of 2